Mississippi, session 2026, HB229.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. The Department of Human Services shall develop and use a process when selecting subgrantees that will receive grant funds from the department which will help ensure that the subgrantees that are selected sufficiently reflect the demographic makeup of the eligible population for the program for which the grants are made. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.